District of Columbia statutes.
47-4475

Certificate of sale; deed of real property.

(a)

If property is sold as provided in § 47-4472, the Mayor shall give to the purchaser a certificate of sale upon payment in full of the purchase price. In the case of real property, the certificate shall set forth the real property purchased, for whose taxes the property was sold, the name of the purchaser, and the price paid.

(b)

In the case of real property sold as provided in § 47-4472 and not redeemed in the manner and within the time specified in § 47-4474(b), upon the surrender of the certificate of sale, the Mayor shall execute a deed to the real property, reciting the facts set forth in the certificate.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334
This section is referenced in § 47-4476.